Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 61. Mississippi Business Investment Act
§ 57-61-25.
Authorization of indebtedness; issuance of bonds; form of bonds; exemption from taxation by state; issuance of refunding bonds; taxable bonds.

The seller is authorized to borrow, on the credit of the state upon receipt of a resolution from the Mississippi Development Authority requesting the same, monies not exceeding the aggregate sum of Three Hundred Eighty-two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($382,500,000.00), not including monies borrowed to refund outstanding bonds, notes or replacement notes, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rate of interest on any such bonds or notes which are not subject to taxation shall not exceed the rates set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, for general obligation bonds.

As evidence of indebtedness authorized in this chapter, general or limited obligation bonds of the state shall be issued, from time to time, to provide monies necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter for such total amounts, in such form, in such denominations payable in such currencies (either domestic or foreign, or both) and subject to such terms and conditions of issue, redemption and maturity, rate of interest and time of payment of interest as the seller directs, except that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than thirty (30) years from date thereof.

All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter shall be signed by the chairman of the seller, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the seller shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the seller.

All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter may be general or limited obligations of the state, and the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi as to general obligation bonds, or the revenues derived from projects assisted as to limited obligation bonds, are hereby pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds and notes.

Such bonds and notes and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

The bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or registered as to both principal and interest, as the seller may determine. If interest coupons are attached, they shall contain the facsimile signature of the chairman and secretary of the seller.

The seller is authorized to provide, by resolution, for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any debt issued under the provisions of this chapter and then outstanding, either by voluntary exchange with the holders of the outstanding debt or to provide funds to redeem and the costs of issuance and retirement of the debt, at maturity or at any call date. The issuance of the refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof and the duties of the issuing officials in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this section, insofar as they may be applicable.

As to bonds issued hereunder and designated as taxable bonds by the seller, any immunity of the state to taxation by the United States government of interest on bonds or notes issued by the state is hereby waived.

The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter after April 9, 2002, may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the authority. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the Mississippi Development Authority. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 13; Laws, 1987, ch. 302, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 569, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 7; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 19; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 553, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 2002 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess., ch. 1, § 89; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 35; Laws, 2007, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 506, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 27; Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 7; Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 32; Laws, 2014, ch. 530, § 10; Laws, 2016, ch. 511, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 390, § 5; ; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 421, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

Joint Legislative Committee Note —

Section 4 of Chapter 421, Laws of 2019, effective July 1, 2019 (approved March 28, 2019), amended this section. Section 8 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2019, effective July 1, 2019 (approved April 12, 2019), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 8 of Chapter 453, Laws of 2019, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes §57-61-25 as amended by Chapter 421, Laws of 2019.

§ 57-61-27.
Sale of bonds; issuance of temporary bonds; investment of bond proceeds; registration of bonds; payment of costs and expenses.

Whenever bonds are issued, they shall be sold by the seller at a competitive or negotiated sale, from time to time, in such manner and at such price as may be determined by the seller to be most advantageous.

When bonds are issued from time to time, the bonds of each issue shall constitute a separate series to be designated by the seller or may be combined for sale as one (1) series with other general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi.

Until permanent bonds can be prepared, the seller may in its discretion issue, in lieu of permanent bonds, temporary bonds in such form and with such privileges as to registration and exchange for permanent bonds as may be determined by the seller.

Pending their application to the purposes authorized, bond proceeds held or deposited by the State Treasurer may be invested or reinvested as are other funds in the custody of the State Treasurer in the manner provided by law. All earnings received from the investment or deposit of such funds shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund.

The State Treasurer shall prepare the necessary registry book to be kept in the office of the duly authorized loan and transfer agent of the state for the registration of any bonds, at the request of owners thereof, according to the terms and conditions of issue directed by the seller.

All costs and expenses in connection with the issue of and sale and registration of the bonds and notes in connection with this chapter may be paid from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued under this chapter.

The seller may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds the employment of one or more persons or firms to assist in the sale of the bonds; to enter into contracts for banks or trust companies located either within or without the State of Mississippi to act as registrars, paying agents, transfer agents or otherwise, for rating of the bonds, and to purchase insurance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 14; Laws, 1991, ch. 397 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 548 § 6; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2010.).

§ 57-61-29.
Authorization of temporary borrowing; issuance of replacement notes and refunding bonds; payment of proceeds to State Treasurer; exemption from taxation.

Pending the issuance of bonds of the state as authorized under this chapter, the seller is hereby authorized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and on the credit of the state, to make temporary borrowings not to exceed two (2) years in anticipation of the issue of bonds in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed advisable prior to the issue of bonds. In order to provide for and in connection with such temporary borrowings, the seller is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state, and in accordance with Section 57-61-27(1), Mississippi Code of 1972, to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement, or agreements, or other agreement or agreements with any banks or trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same, which agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter as may be authorized by the seller.

All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued, from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding in the aggregate the applicable statutory and constitutional debt limitation, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and condition of sale and issue, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest and time of payment of interest as the seller shall authorize and direct and in accordance with this chapter. Such authorization and direction may provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to the notes and replacement notes thereby authorized for issuance as the seller may determine and direct.

When the authorization and direction of the seller provide for the issuance of replacement notes, the seller is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state to enter into agreements with any banks, trust companies, investment banking firms or other institutions or persons in the United States having the power to enter the same:

To purchase or underwrite an issue or series of issues of notes.

To enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreements, and to draw moneys pursuant to any such agreements on the terms and conditions set forth therein and to issue notes as evidence of borrowings made under any such agreements.

To appoint or act as issuing and paying agent or agents with respect to notes.

To do such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on such notes.

Such agreements may provide for the compensation of any purchasers or underwriters of notes or replacement notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission at the time of issuance thereof, and for all other costs and expenses, including fees for agreements related to the notes issuing and paying agent costs. Costs and expenses of issuance may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.

When the authorization and direction of the seller provides for the issuance of replacement notes, it shall, at or prior to the time of delivery of these notes or replacement notes, determine the principal amounts, dates of issue, interest rate or rates, rates of discount, denominations and all other terms and conditions relating to the issuance. The State Treasurer shall perform all acts and things necessary to pay or cause to be paid, when due, all principal of and interest on the notes being refunded by replacement notes and to assure that the same may draw upon any moneys available for that purpose pursuant to any purchase loan or credit agreements established with respect thereto, all subject to the authorization and direction of the seller.

Outstanding notes evidencing such borrowings may be funded and retired by the issuance and sale of the bonds of the state as hereinafter authorized. The refunding bonds must be issued and sold not later than a date two (2) years after the date of issuance of the first notes evidencing such borrowings to the extent that payment of such notes has not otherwise been made or provided for by sources other than proceeds of replacement notes.

The proceeds of all such temporary borrowing shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of Section 57-61-31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Notes issued hereunder, and the income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 15; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1989).

§ 57-61-31.
Disposition of proceeds from bond sales and other funds.

The proceeds realized from the sale of bonds and notes under this chapter, other than refunding bonds and replacement notes, shall be paid to the State Treasurer and deposited into the Mississippi Business Investment Fund and specifically dedicated to the purposes enumerated in this chapter.

All nonfederal funds which may become available for the purposes of this chapter shall be deposited in the Mississippi Business Investment Fund and shall be allocated for the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds and replacement notes shall be applied solely to the payment of the principal of and the accrued interest on and premium, if any, and costs of redemption of the bonds and notes for which such obligations have been issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-32.
Funds to defray costs of state’s share in North Mississippi fish hatchery.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall certify to the department the amount of money necessary to defray the cost of the state’s share in constructing the North Mississippi fish hatchery, which amount shall not be more than Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00); and the department shall, if funds have not otherwise been made available, provide a grant for such amount out of the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter. Of the funds provided hereunder, any amounts not expended on the fish hatchery shall be remitted to the department for deposit into the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund.

The private match requirements of Section 57-61-9(2)(d), Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not apply to any loan or grant made under this section.

Repealed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 57-61-33.
Grant for completion of Technology Transfer Center at National Space Technology Laboratory.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Governor’s Office of General Services shall certify to the Board of Economic Development the amount of money necessary to complete the construction, furnishing and equipping of the Technology Transfer Center at the National Space Technology Laboratory site in Hancock County, which amount shall not be more than Three Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,200,000.00), and the board shall if funds have not otherwise been made available provide a grant to the bureau for such amount out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter. Any funds remaining unexpended upon completion of such project shall be deposited in the Mississippi Business Investment Sinking Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1986).

§ 57-61-34.
Loans for business incubation centers.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter to be made available as interest-bearing loans to municipalities or private companies to aid in the establishment of business incubation centers and the creation of new and expanding research and development and technology-based business and industry. In making loans under this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall attempt to provide for an equitable distribution of such loans among each of the congressional districts of this state in order to promote economic development across the entire state.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall require that any private company receiving a loan under subsection (1) of this section enter into a binding commitment to meet the following minimum obligations, in return for obtaining a loan derived from the proceeds of any bonds issued under this section after July 1, 2005:

The private company shall create a certain minimum number of jobs over a certain period of time, as determined by the authority, and such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law;

The private company shall invest, over a certain period of time, a certain minimum amount of capital within the state, as determined by the authority; and

The private company must meet such other requirements as the Mississippi Development Authority considers proper.

If the private company fails to satisfy any commitment under this subsection, then the company must repay an amount equal to all or a portion of the funds loaned by the state under this subsection, as determined by the Mississippi Development Authority.

In exercising the power given it under this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall work in conjunction with the University Research Center and may contract with the center to provide space and assistance to business incubation centers as the center is authorized to do pursuant to Section 57-13-13.

The requirements of Section 57-61-9 shall not apply to any loan made under this section. The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish criteria and guidelines to govern loans made pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 523, § 10; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 9; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 57-61-35.
Representation of seller by Attorney General; payment of administrative, legal, and other expenses.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the seller in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for, and the seller is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds authorized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 419, § 18; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 57-61-36.
Development infrastructure grant fund; housing development revolving loan fund; equipment and public facilities grant and loan fund; capital access program.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Fourteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($14,500,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making grants to municipalities through a Development Infrastructure Grant Fund to complete infrastructure related to new or expanded industry.

[Repealed]

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize the monies transferred from the Housing Development Revolving Loan Fund and not more than Eighty-nine Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($89,100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making grants or loans to municipalities through an equipment and public facilities grant and loan fund to aid in infrastructure-related improvements as determined by the Mississippi Development Authority, the purchase of equipment and in the purchase, construction or repair and renovation of public facilities. Any bonds previously issued for the Development Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program which have not been loaned or applied for are eligible to be administered as grants or loans. In making grants and loans under this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall attempt to provide for an equitable distribution of such grants and loans among each of the congressional districts of this state in order to promote economic development across the entire state.

The requirements of Section 57-61-9 shall not apply to any grant made under this subsection. The Mississippi Development Authority may establish criteria and guidelines to govern grants made pursuant to this subsection.

[Repealed]

The Mississippi Development Authority may establish a Capital Access Program and may contract with any financial institution to participate in the program upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall consider necessary and proper. The Mississippi Development Authority may establish loss reserve accounts at financial institutions that participate in the program and require payments by the financial institution and the borrower to such loss reserve accounts. All monies in such loss reserve accounts is the property of the Mississippi Development Authority.

Under the Capital Access Program a participating financial institution may make a loan to any borrower the Mississippi Development Authority determines to be qualified under rules and regulations adopted by the authority and be protected against losses from such loans as provided in the program. Under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Mississippi Development Authority, a participating financial institution may submit claims for the reimbursement for losses incurred as a result of default on loans by qualified borrowers.

Under the Capital Access Program a participating financial institution may make a loan that is secured by the assignment of the proceeds of a contract between the borrower and a public entity if the Mississippi Development Authority determines the loan to be qualified under the rules and regulations adopted by the authority. Under such rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Mississippi Development Authority, a participating financial institution may submit an application to the authority requesting that a loan secured pursuant to this paragraph be funded under the Capital Access Program.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority may utilize not more than One Million Five Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($1,550,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of making payments to loan loss reserve accounts established at financial institutions that participate in the Capital Access Program established by the Mississippi Development Authority; however, any portion of the bond proceeds authorized to be utilized by this paragraph that are not utilized for making payments to loss reserve accounts may be utilized by the Mississippi Development Authority to advance funds to financial institutions that participate in the Capital Access Program pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting Warren County, Mississippi, in the continuation and completion of the study for the proposed Kings Point Levee.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of developing a long-range plan for coordinating the resources of the state institutions of higher learning, the community and junior colleges, the Mississippi Development Authority and other state agencies in order to promote economic development in the state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall use not more than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of providing assistance to municipalities that have received Community Development Block Grant funds for repair, renovation and other improvements to buildings for use as community centers. Assistance provided to a municipality under this subsection shall be used by the municipality to match such Community Development Block Grant funds. The maximum amount of assistance that may be provided to a municipality under this subsection shall not exceed Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) in the aggregate.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting in paying the costs of constructing a new spillway and related bridge and dam structures at Lake Mary in Wilkinson County, Mississippi, including construction of a temporary dam and diversion canal, removing existing structures, removing and stockpiling riprap, spillway construction, dam embankment construction, road access, constructing bridges and related structures, design and construction engineering and field testing.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter for the purpose of assisting the City of Holly Springs, Mississippi, in providing water and sewer and other infrastructure services in the Marshall, Benton and Tippah Counties area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 556, § 17; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 6; Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 584, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 418 , § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 502, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 384, § 1; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess., ch. 1, § 90; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 37; Laws, 2006, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 517, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 506, § 9; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 29; Laws, 2010 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 33; Laws, 2014, ch. 530, § 11; Laws, 2016, ch. 511, § 17; Laws, 2017, ch. 390, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 412, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 421, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 57-61-37.
Authorization for municipalities to borrow; terms; evidence of indebtedness.

Each municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to borrow money from the board pursuant to the terms and provisions of this chapter. Each municipality is further authorized and empowered to pay to the board such fees and charges for services hereunder as the board may prescribe.

Each municipality is hereby authorized to evidence the borrowing of money from the board pursuant to this chapter by the issuance of evidences of indebtedness under the provisions of this section and to sell such evidences of indebtedness to the board to raise money for any purpose or purposes for which the board is authorized to loan money to such municipality under the terms of this chapter. Except as specifically provided in this chapter, such evidences of indebtedness shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of Sections 21-33-307, 21-33-309, 21-33-311, 21-33-313, 21-33-315, 21-33-317, 21-33-319, 21-33-321 and 21-33-323 in the case of cities or incorporated towns, and in accordance with the provisions of Sections 19-9-7, 19-9-9, 19-9-11, 19-9-13, 19-9-15, 19-9-17, 19-9-19, 19-9-21, 19-9-23, 19-9-25 and 19-9-29 in the case of counties. Bonds or other evidences of indebtedness which are issued either pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any other law as evidence of loans made pursuant to this chapter, shall not be deemed indebtedness within the meaning specified in Section 21-33-303 with regard to cities or incorporated towns, and in Section 19-9-5 with regard to counties. The preceding sentence shall apply to all such bonds and evidences of indebtedness outstanding as of the effective date of this provision and to all such bonds and evidences of indebtedness hereafter issued.

In connection with the issuance of evidences of indebtedness under the provisions of this chapter by cities, incorporated towns and counties, the following provisions shall specifically apply:

When publishing notice of intent to issue bonds as required under the terms of Section 21-33-307 or Section 19-9-11, as the case may be, the municipality shall publish such notice once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the first publication to be not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date set for authorizing such issuance and the last publication to be not more than seven (7) days prior to such date.

Such evidences of indebtedness shall be secured: (i) by the revenues derived by the municipality from the ownership, operation or lease of the project or improvements funded with proceeds of the loan from the board to such municipality under the terms of this chapter or by loan repayments from the private company derived by the municipality from the loan to the private company of the proceeds of the loan from the board to such municipality under the terms of this chapter, but only to the extent, in whole or in part, pledged by the municipality, which pledge may be on a basis subordinate to other obligations or agreements of the municipality; (ii) by the sources of repayment provided for under the terms of subsections (7) and (8) of Section 57-61-15 of this chapter; (iii) and as provided by Chapter 33, Title 21, Mississippi Code of 1972, in the case of cities and incorporated towns, and Chapter 9, Title 19, Mississippi Code of 1972, in the case of counties but only in the event that the sources provided by items (i) and (ii) hereof are insufficient therefor. For the purposes of Section 27-39-321, the evidences of indebtedness issued hereunder shall be deemed to be “general obligation bonds.”

Such evidences of indebtedness may be sold only to the board at private sale and may be sold at such price or prices, in such manner and at such times as may be agreed to by the municipality and the board, and the municipality may pay all expenses, premiums, fees and commissions which it may deem necessary and advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof and such evidences of indebtedness shall mature at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years and in such amounts and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as required for loans made under the provisions of this chapter and as may be agreed upon by the board and the municipality; provided, that in connection with financing a Navy home port, the municipality may obtain a letter of credit and pledge to the repayment thereof the same sources pledged to such evidences of indebtedness or negotiate and enter into a credit agreement, trust indenture or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution for the purpose of making or receiving any payments required to be made to the United States Navy to accommodate a Navy home port.

The proceeds of such evidences of indebtedness shall be applied to the following: (i) the purpose for which such evidences of indebtedness were issued; (ii) the payment of all costs of issuance of such evidences of indebtedness; (iii) the payment of any fees and charges established by the board; (iv) the payment of interest on such evidences of indebtedness for a period of time not greater than the period of time estimated to be required to complete the purpose for which the evidences of indebtedness were issued or to the extent provided by resolution of the municipality and approved by the board; (v) the payment of any costs relating to obtaining or entering into a credit agreement, loan disbursement agreement, trust indenture or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution for the purpose of securing, making or receiving any payments required to be made to the United States Navy to accommodate a Navy home port.

Evidences of indebtedness issued under this section may be validated in the manner and with the force and effect provided in Section 31-13-1 et seq.

This section shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternate and complete method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental to any provisions of any other laws and not in derogation of any such provisions. In connection with the issuance of evidences of indebtedness, a municipality shall not be required to comply with the provisions of any other law except as provided herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 57-61-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 560, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1994).

[Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 6]

§ 57-61-41.
Port Revitalization Revolving Loan Fund.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Mississippi Development Authority shall utilize not more than Twelve Million Dollars ($12,000,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued in this chapter to be made available to state, county or municipal port and airport authorities through a Port Revitalization Revolving Loan Fund for the purpose of making loans to port authorities for the improvement of port and airport facilities to promote commerce and economic growth. Proceeds shall not be made available to provide any facilities for utilization by a gaming vessel.

In exercising its authority, the Mississippi Development Authority shall work in conjunction with the Water Resources Council to establish criteria and guidelines to govern loans made pursuant to this section.

The Mississippi Development Authority may, on a case-by-case basis, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under this section to state, county and municipal port and airport authorities located in the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 461, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 553, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 502, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 57-61-42.
Repealed.

[Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 2002.)]

§ 57-61-43.
Small Farm Loan Program at Alcorn State University.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall utilize not more than One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds issued in this chapter to provide a grant to provide funds for the Small Farm Loan Program at Alcorn State University.

The requirements of Section 57-61-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not apply to the grant made under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 5, eff from and after July 2, 1998.

§ 57-61-44.
Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the Department of Economic and Community Development may deposit not more than Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) out of the proceeds of bonds issued in this chapter into the revolving fund created in Section 43-3-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, for use by the Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 559, § 6, eff from and after July 2, 1998.